Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-907 Distribution in kind;
evidence. If distribution in kind is made, the personal representative
shall execute an instrument or deed of distribution assigning, transferring or
releasing the assets to the distributee as evidence of the distributee's title
to the property. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next